Utah statutes.
41-6a-1714.   Warning signs.

The Department of Transportation shall place adequate warning signs wherever it considers proper within the state notifying all persons using the public roads, highways, parks, or recreation areas of the provisions of Sections 41-6a-1712 and 41-6a-1713.

